New Jersey, session 221, S3461.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.2C:5-5 is amended to read as follows: 2C:5-5.      Burglar's Tools. a.     Any person who manufactures or possesses any engine, machine, tool, [or] implement, or program adapted, designed or commonly used for committing or facilitating any offense in chapter 20 of this Title or offenses involving forcible entry into premises[.] (1)  Knowing the same to be so adapted or designed or commonly used; and (2)  With either a purpose so to use or employ it, or with a purpose to provide it to some person who he knows has such a purpose to use or employ it, is guilty of an offense. An engine, machine, tool, implement, or program manufactured or possessed in violation of this section shall include such which may provide access to a premises through a keyless locking mechanism. b.    Any person who publishes plans or instructions dealing with the manufacture or use of any burglar tools as defined above, with the intent that such publication be used for committing or facilitating any offense in chapter 20 of this Title or offenses involving forcible entry into premises is guilty of an offense. The offense under a. or b. of this section is a crime of the fourth degree if the defendant manufactured such instrument or implements or published such plans or instructions; otherwise it is a disorderly persons offense. (cf: P.L.1992, c.198, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately